test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_EEHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     hltanée.eehl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: hltanée.eehl
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl
     hltanée.eehl+V+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehls
     hltanée.eehl+V+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehlang
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hltanée.eehläsaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hltanée.eehläs
     hltanée.eehl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehläsaang
     hltanée.eehl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehläsga
     hltanée.eehl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehläsaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehläsaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asa'áa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asa'áang
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asaasdláa
     hltanée.eehl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asaasdláang
     hltanée.eehl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'uuj
     hltanée.eehl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hltanée.eehläsaa'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ujaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'uujaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehläsaa'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ahlanggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ahlanggan
     hltanée.eehl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'ahlanggiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hltanée.eehläsaa'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehl'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+REFLEXIVE: hltanée.eehl'ahl
     hltanée.eehl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hltanée.eehläseehl
     hltanée.eehl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: hltanée.eehl'uu
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'waa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'waa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'waang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eehl'wägan
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'aawaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eehl'aawaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehl'waas
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hltanée.eehl'aawaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'aawaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'wägiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'wägaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'wägaangaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hltanée.eehl'waaäsaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hltanée.eehl'waaäs
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waaäsaang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waaäsga
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waaäsaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'waaäsaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'waa'uuj
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'waa'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hltanée.eehl'waaäsaa'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'waa'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'waa'ujaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'waa'uujaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waaäsaa'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'waa'ahlanggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: hltanée.eehl'waa'ahlanggan
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehl'waa'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'aawaa'ahlang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hltanée.eehl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: hltanée.eehl'waa'ahl
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hltanée.eehl'waaäseehl
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: hltanée.eehl'ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'angga
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'anggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eehl'anggan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'aangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eehl'aangaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehl'ans
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hltanée.eehl'aangaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'angang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'aangaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'anggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'anggiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'anggaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'anggaangaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hltanée.eehl'angäsaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hltanée.eehl'angäs
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'angäsaang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'angäsga
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'angäsaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'angäsaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asaa'áng
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asaa'ánggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehlang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'uuj
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hltanée.eehl'angäsaa'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ang'ujaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'ang'uujaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'angäsaa'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'aang'ahlanggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: hltanée.eehl'aang'ahlanggan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'angäsaa'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehl'aang'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'aangaa'ahlang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hltanée.eehl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: hltanée.eehl'aang'ahl
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hltanée.eehl'angäseehl
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: hltanée.eehl'ang'uu
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ang'wägan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ang'aawaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ang'aawaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waas
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hltanée.eehl'ang'aawaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'ang'aawaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'ang'wägiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'ang'wägaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'ang'wägaangaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäs
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsaang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsga
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'uuj
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'ujaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hltanée.eehl'ang'waa'ahlans
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: hltanée.eehl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hltanée.eehl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hltanée.eehl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
